Utah statutes.
22-3-407.   Receipts not normally apportioned -- Insurance policies and
similar contracts.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a trustee shall allocate
to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in
which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract
that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction
of, or loss of title to a trust asset.  The trustee shall allocate dividends
on an insurance policy to income if the premiums on the policy are paid from
income, and to principal if the premiums are paid from principal.
(2)  A trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures
the trustee against loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary,
loss of income, or, subject to Section 22-3-403, loss of profits from a
business.
(3)  This section does not apply to a contract to which Section 22-3-409
applies.
